Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 13 CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT ACT
26-13-121. Review and modification of child support orders.

The general assembly finds that review of child support orders is required in order for this state to comply with the federal "Family Support Act of 1988", the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", and the federal "Deficit Reduction Act of 2005".

The delegate child support enforcement unit shall provide the obligor and obligee not less than once every thirty-six months notice of their right to request a review of a child support order. The notice may be included in the support order.

Either party to a case in which services are being provided pursuant to section 26-13-106 may submit a written request for review of the current child support order. The request shall include the financial information from the requesting party necessary to conduct a calculation pursuant to the Colorado child support guidelines set forth in section 14-10-115, C.R.S. The requesting party shall provide his or her financial information on the form required by the division of child support enforcement.

The delegate child support enforcement unit may initiate a review of a current child support order upon its own request.

The delegate child support enforcement unit shall review each request received from a party and:

If it has been thirty-six months or more since the last review of the current child support order, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall grant the request for review; or

If it has been fewer than thirty-six months since the last review of the current child support order, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall grant the request for review if the requesting party provides a reason for review that could result in a change to the monthly support obligation based upon the application of the Colorado child support guidelines set forth in section 14-10-115, C.R.S. If the reason for review arises from the circumstances of the requesting party, supporting documentation or a demonstration that there has been a substantial and continuing change in circumstances warranting a review of the child support amount shall be included with the request. The delegate child support enforcement unit shall assess and consider the information provided to determine whether a review is warranted and should be conducted. If a request is denied pursuant to this paragraph (b), the delegate child support enforcement unit shall notify the requesting party in writing that the denial does not limit the party's right to seek modification of a child support order pursuant to section 14-10-122, C.R.S.

(2.5) If there is an active assignment of rights, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall review the child support order once every thirty-six months to determine if an adjustment of the child support order is appropriate.

If the delegate child support enforcement unit grants the request for review, it shall issue a notice of review to the parties. In the case of an automatic review in which there is an active assignment of rights, both parties shall be considered nonrequesters. The notice of review shall advise the parties that a review is to be conducted and allow the nonrequesters twenty days from the date of the notice to provide the financial information necessary to calculate the child support obligation pursuant to section

14-10-115

, C.R.S. If the child support order is an administrative order established pursuant to article 13.5 of this title, the review shall be conducted pursuant to section

26-13.5-112

.

The review of the child support order shall be conducted on or before the thirtieth day after notice of review is sent to the parties. The review may be conducted in person at the delegate child support enforcement office or via United States mail or via an electronic communication method. The delegate child support enforcement unit may grant a continuance of the review for good cause. The continuance shall be for a reasonable period of time to be determined by the delegate child support enforcement unit, not to exceed thirty days. During the review, the determination of the monthly support obligation shall be based on the child support guidelines set forth in section

14-10-115

, C.R.S. To obtain information necessary to conduct the review, the delegate child support enforcement unit is authorized to serve, by first-class mail or by electronic means if mutually agreed upon, an administrative subpoena to any person, corporation, partnership, or other entity, public employee retirement benefit plan, financial institution, or labor union for an appearance or for the production of records and financial documents.

An adjustment to the order shall be appropriate only if the standard set forth in section

14-10-122 (1)(b)

, C.R.S., is met.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 25, § 5, effective January 1, 2003.)

After the review is completed, the child support enforcement unit shall provide a post-review notice advising the obligor and obligee of the review results. The review results shall include a child support guideline worksheet. If the review indicates that an adjustment to the current monthly support obligation should be made, a proposed order shall also be included. The delegate child support enforcement unit shall provide all supporting financial documentation used to calculate the monthly support obligation to both parties. The review results shall also contain an advisement to the parties of the right to challenge the proposed order, the time frame in which to assert the challenge, and the method for doing so.

The obligor and obligee shall be given fifteen days from the date of the post-review notice to challenge the review results. The grounds for the challenge shall be limited to the issue of mathematical or factual error in the calculation of the monthly support obligation. The delegate child support enforcement unit may grant an extension of up to fifteen days to challenge the review results based upon a showing of good cause.

The delegate child support enforcement unit shall have fifteen days from the date of receipt of the challenge to respond to a challenge based upon a mathematical or factual error. If a challenge results in a change to the monthly support obligation, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall provide an amended notice of review to the obligor and obligee. The obligor and obligee shall be given fifteen days from the date of the amended notice of review to challenge the results of any subsequent review. The grounds for the challenge shall be limited to the issue of mathematical or factual error in calculation of the monthly support obligation.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1654, § 15, effective July 1, 2008.)

If the review indicates that a change to the monthly support obligation is appropriate and the review is not challenged or all challenges have been addressed, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall file a motion to modify with the court. A copy of the motion shall be provided by the delegate child support enforcement unit to the obligor and obligee and shall contain an advisement that the obligor and obligee may file a written response with the court setting forth any objections to the motion to modify.
(5) (a) (I) If the review indicates that a change to the monthly support obligation is appropriate and the review is not challenged or all challenges have been addressed, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall file a motion to modify with the court. A copy of the motion shall be provided by the delegate child support enforcement unit to the obligor and obligee and shall contain an advisement that the obligor and obligee may file a written response with the court setting forth any objections to the motion to modify.

If a motion to modify is filed with the court, the court may enter an order granting the motion, issue a revised order, or set a hearing. Regardless of whether the order has been approved by the obligor and obligee, the court may grant the motion to modify.

If a hearing is necessary, the court shall hold a hearing within forty-five days after service of the motion to modify, and the court shall decide only the issues of child support and medical support. Any documentary evidence provided by the obligee or the obligor or by the delegate child support enforcement unit may be admitted into evidence by the court without the necessity of laying a foundation for its admissibility, and the court may determine the relative weight or credibility to give any such documentation.

(5.3) If income information is not available for the obligor, the delegate child support enforcement unit may file a motion to modify child support with the court.

(5.7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit a delegate child support enforcement unit's right to file a motion to modify with the court pursuant to section 14-10-122, C.R.S.

The state board shall adopt rules and regulations establishing standardized forms and procedures as necessary to implement the provisions of this article.

This article shall apply to all orders for support of a child for whom child support enforcement services are being provided.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any party's right to seek modification of a child support order pursuant to article 5 of title 14, section 14-10-122, section 19-4-119, or section 19-6-104 (4), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 893, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(5)(b) amended, p. 257, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1), (3), and (9) amended, p. 212, § 16, effective August 1.

L. 93:

(8) amended, p. 1607, § 13, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1295, § 40, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2), (3)(a), (3)(c), (3)(d), and (4)(b) amended, p. 25, § 5, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2007:

(2.5) added, p. 1654, § 14, effective October 1; (1), (2), (3)(a), (3)(b), (4), and (5)(a) amended and (5.3) and (5.7) added, p. 1654, § 15, effective July 1, 2008.

L. 2021:

(5.3) amended, (HB 21-1220), ch. 212, p. 1129, § 6, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

26-13-121.5. Enforcement of obligation to maintain health insurance.

If a parent has been ordered to provide health insurance, as defined in section 14-14-102 (4.7), C.R.S., and such insurance is available at a reasonable cost consistent with the provisions of section 14-10-115 (10)(g), C.R.S., the delegate child support enforcement unit shall use the federally mandated national medical support notice to provide notice of the insurance provision to that parent's employer unless the child or children are already enrolled in a health insurance plan in accordance with the order.

The national medical support notice shall be sent to the employer by means of first-class mail. The notice shall be continuing and shall remain in effect and be binding upon any current or successor employer upon whom it is served until further notice by the court or by the delegate child support enforcement unit. Receipt of the national medical support notice by the employer shall confer jurisdiction of the court over the employer. A notice describing the rights and conditions in paragraphs (a) to (c) of subsection (3) of this section shall be sent to the obligor by first-class mail.

The obligor shall be provided with a copy of the national medical support notice upon submitting a written request to the delegate child support enforcement unit. The obligor shall have ten days from the date the notice describing the rights and conditions in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection (3) is mailed to the obligor in which to file a written objection with the delegate child support enforcement unit based only upon one of the following mistakes of fact:

There is a mistake in identity and the employee is not the obligor; or

There is no court order to provide health insurance.

The delegate child support enforcement unit shall have ten days from the date the objection is mailed by the obligor to resolve the mistake of fact. The delegate child support enforcement unit shall immediately notify the obligor in writing, by first class mail, of its decision. If the delegate child support enforcement unit agrees with the obligor, it shall immediately send a notice, by first-class mail, to the employer to terminate the national medical support notice.

If the obligor does not agree with the decision of the delegate child support enforcement unit, he or she may file a written objection with the court. Upon any determination by the court which results in a finding in favor of the obligor, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall immediately mail a notice of termination of the national medical support notice to the employer and to the obligor, by first-class mail. The termination of the health insurance shall only be prospective and the employee shall not be entitled to any reimbursement for any premiums withheld or deducted from his or her wage prior to the plan administrator's prompt termination of the deduction for health insurance.

The employer shall complete the employer response, if applicable, attached to part A of the national medical support notice, which part A includes information for and responsibilities of the employer, and shall return the employer response to the delegate child support enforcement unit within twenty business days after the date of the notice.

If the employer does not maintain or contribute to family health insurance coverage or if the obligor is not eligible for family health insurance coverage through his or her employer or if the obligor is no longer employed with that employer, then the employer shall specify such relevant circumstances or conditions in the employer response and shall return part A of the national medical support notice to the delegate child support enforcement unit.

If none of the circumstances or conditions described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4) apply, then the employer shall complete the applicable sections of the employer response and transfer part B of the national medical support notice to the appropriate plan administrator within twenty business days after the date of such notice. If the employer offers a number of different types of benefits through separate health insurance plans, the employer shall send copies of part B to each appropriate plan administrator.

Any employer who fails to comply with the time frames stated in this subsection (4) may be found by the court to be in contempt of court.

The plan administrator shall complete and return part B of the national medical support notice to the delegate child support enforcement unit within forty business days after the date of such notice.

If the plan administrator determines that the national medical support notice is not a qualified medical child support order, the plan administrator shall specify on part B the basis for such determination.

If the plan administrator determines that the national medical support notice is a qualified medical child support order, the plan administrator shall complete the appropriate parts of the plan administrator response. Upon enrollment of the child or children, the plan administrator shall provide the following information to the delegate child support enforcement unit: The names of the persons covered by the health insurance plan; the complete name, address, and telephone number of the insurance carrier; and the applicable policy and group number of the health insurance plan. The plan administrator shall furnish the obligee with a description of the health insurance coverage available, any required forms, information describing the steps needed to effectuate such coverage, and the effective date of the coverage.

If the plan administrator reports on part B of the national medical support notice that the obligor is not enrolled in a plan, as defined in section 14-14-102 (6.5), C.R.S., and more than one option is available under the plan, the plan administrator shall provide to the delegate child support enforcement unit a summary plan description of each option including the additional participant contribution required by each option and whether there is a limited service area with any option. The delegate child support enforcement unit shall forward the information to the obligee. The obligee shall select one of the available options. Within twenty business days after the date the plan administrator's response was sent to the delegate child support enforcement unit, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall notify the plan administrator of the selection. If the delegate child support enforcement unit does not reply to the plan administrator, the plan administrator shall enroll the child or children in the least costly plan otherwise available to the obligor for the benefit of the child or children.

Promptly after enrollment, the plan administrator shall notify the obligor that coverage of the child or children is or will become available and the date the coverage takes effect. The obligor may file a written objection with the court after the date of the notice of such enrollment by the plan administrator if the premium amount does not meet the definition of reasonable cost as provided in section 14-10-115 (10)(g), C.R.S. Upon any determination by the court which results in a finding in favor of the obligor, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall immediately mail a notice of termination of the national medical support notice to the obligor and to the employer by first-class mail. The termination of the health insurance shall only be prospective and the obligor shall not be entitled to any reimbursement for any premiums withheld or deducted from his or her wage prior to the plan administrator's prompt termination of the deduction for health insurance.

If the plan administrator indicates that the child or children are enrolled in an option under the plan for which the employer has determined that the obligor's contribution exceeds the maximum amount allowed to be withheld under state and federal withholding limitations or prioritization, then the employer shall indicate the same and return part A of the national medical support notice to the delegate child support enforcement unit. Upon notification from the plan administrator that the child or children are enrolled, the employer shall withhold from the obligor's income any employee contribution and transfer the contribution to the appropriate plan or, if appropriate, notify the delegate child support enforcement unit that enrollment cannot be completed because of limitations or prioritization on withholding.

Any employer who fails to comply with the time frames stated in this subsection (5) may be found by the court to be in contempt of court.

The employer shall initiate withholding until and unless the employer receives notice from the delegate child support enforcement unit that the obligor is not responsible for the child's or children's health insurance coverage.

The employer shall notify the plan administrator when an obligor has completed a waiting period or has otherwise met eligibility requirements for coverage.

The national medical support notice shall not be terminated or modified except for the reasons set forth in section 14-14-112 (2)(h), C.R.S.

If the national medical support notice is terminated or modified, then the employer shall comply with the provisions of section 14-14-112 (2)(k), C.R.S., regarding termination of coverage.

An employer who is served with a national medical support notice shall follow the provisions of section 14-14-112 (2)(g) and (6), C.R.S., regarding notification of the termination of employment by the named obligor.

Any employer who wrongfully fails to comply with this section may be subject to the sanctions set forth in section 14-14-112 (5), C.R.S.

An employer shall neither refuse to hire a person nor discharge or take disciplinary action against an employee because of service of the national medical support notice pursuant to this section. Any person who violates this subsection (12) may be found by the court to be in contempt of court. If an employer discharges an employee in violation of the provisions of this section, the employee may, within ninety days, bring a civil action for the recovery of wages lost as a result of the violation and for an order requiring the reinstatement of the employee. Damages recoverable shall be lost wages not to exceed six weeks, costs, and reasonable attorney fees.

An employer who complies with a national medical support notice to deduct for health insurance benefits pursuant to this section shall not be liable to the obligor for wrongful withholding.

The delegate child support enforcement unit shall comply with the provisions of section 14-14-112 (9), C.R.S., when the order for medical support is modified or terminated.

Deductions for health insurance shall also be ordered by a delegate child support enforcement unit under the provisions of the "Colorado Administrative Procedure Act for the Establishment and Enforcement of Child Support", created in article 13.5 of this title.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 26, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) and (5)(e) amended, p. 108, § 6, effective March 16; (2) and IP(3)(a) amended, p. 1657, § 16, effective May 31.

26-13-122. Administrative lien and attachment.

The state child support enforcement agency may issue a notice of administrative lien and attachment to any person, insurance company, or agency providing workers' compensation insurance benefits for any employer to attach workers' compensation benefits of an obligor who is responsible for the support of a child on whose behalf the obligee is receiving support enforcement services from the state's child support enforcement agency pursuant to this article. The notice shall include the following statements and information:

The name and address of the person, insurance company, or agency providing workers' compensation insurance benefits;

The name, last known address, and social security number of the obligor;

The total amount owed for child support obligations, arrearages for child support, and child support debt;

The percentage of benefits or the actual amount to be withheld from each payment;

A statement that the notice of administrative lien and attachment is to take effect no later than the first payment after receipt of the notice;

A statement that the person, insurance company, or agency providing workers' compensation insurance benefits may not withhold more than the limitations set forth in section 13-54-104 (3), C.R.S.;

A statement that if more than one notice of administrative lien and attachment is received for the same obligor, the priorities set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall apply;

Instruction on the disbursement of the withheld amounts, including the requirements that each disbursement:

Shall be forwarded to the address indicated on the notice;

Shall be forwarded within ten days after the date of each deduction and withholding;

Shall be identified by the case number, the family support registry account number, and the name and social security number of each obligor and shall identify the date the deduction was made and the amount of the payment;

May be combined with other disbursements in a single payment to a single court or to the family support registry, if required to be sent to the registry, if the individual account of each disbursement is identified, as required by subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (h);

A statement that compliance with the notice of administrative lien and attachment shall not subject the person, insurance company, or agency providing workers' compensation insurance benefits to liability to the obligor for wrongful withholding;

A statement that noncompliance with the notice of administrative lien and attachment may subject the person or insurance company providing workers' compensation insurance benefits to liability and sanctions. If any person or insurance company providing workers' compensation insurance benefits wrongfully fails to deduct and withhold benefits in accordance with the provisions of this section, it may be held liable for an amount up to the accumulated amount such person or insurance company should have withheld from the obligor's benefits.

A statement that, as long as the obligor is receiving workers' compensation benefits, the notice of administrative lien and attachment shall not be terminated or modified, except upon written notice by the state child support enforcement agency.

An administrative lien and attachment for the collection from workers' compensation benefits for current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, or child support when combined with maintenance shall be continuing and shall have priority over any garnishment, lien, or wage assignment other than a notice previously served pursuant to this subsection (2) or a wage assignment activated pursuant to section 14-14-107 or 14-14-111, C.R.S., as those sections existed prior to July 1, 1996, or section 14-14-111.5, C.R.S. Such administrative lien and attachment shall require the person, insurance company, or agency providing workers' compensation insurance benefits to withhold, pursuant to section 13-54-104 (3), C.R.S., the portion of earnings subject to attachment at each succeeding disbursement interval until such amount is satisfied or the attachment is released in writing by the state child support enforcement agency.

In order to attach and collect workers' compensation income for current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, medical support, child support arrearages, or child support when combined with maintenance, the state child support enforcement agency is authorized to serve, by first-class mail or by electronic means if mutually agreed upon, a notice of administrative lien and attachment on any person, insurance company, or agency holding workers' compensation benefits that are owed to an obligor. A copy of the administrative lien and attachment shall be provided to the obligor and shall include information on the obligor's right to object to the administrative lien and attachment and to request an administrative review pursuant to the rules of the state board.

At the time a claim for workers' compensation benefits is filed, the employee shall be notified that if a child support obligation is owed, benefits may be attached and payment of the child support obligation may be withheld and forwarded to the obligee.

For purposes of this section, "insurance company" includes Pinnacol Assurance.

Subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall apply to all child support obligations ordered as part of any proceeding, regardless of when the order was entered, and all such child support obligors shall be subject to notice of administrative lien and attachment as described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 2046, § 5, effective June 3.

L. 96:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 617, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(6) added, p. 563, § 14, effective April 29; (2) and (3) amended, p. 1295, § 41, effective July 1.

L. 98:

IP(1) amended, p. 1414, § 81, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2002:

(5) amended, p. 1896, § 68, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(d) amended, p. 388, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 1657, § 17, effective May 31.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending subsections (2) and (3), see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

26-13-122.3. Administrative lien and levy of accounts held by financial institutions - definitions.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Account" has the same meaning as defined in section 26-13-128 (7)(a).

"Financial institution" has the same meaning as defined in section 26-13-128 (7)(b).

The state child support enforcement agency may issue a notice of administrative lien and levy to any financial institution or its agent holding an obligor parent's account or accounts identified pursuant to section 26-13-128. The administrative lien and levy may be issued when an obligor who is responsible for the support of a child on whose behalf the obligee is receiving support enforcement services from the state's child support enforcement agency pursuant to this article 13 is past due on child support obligations. The notice must include the following statements and information:

The name and address of the financial institution holding an obligor parent's financial account or accounts;

The obligor's name, last-known address, and social security number except where other identifying information may be provided in lieu of a social security number;

The total amount owed for past-due child support as identified by the state as provided in section 26-13-128 (2)(c);

A statement that the notice of administrative lien and levy takes effect upon the receipt by the financial institution of the notice;

Instructions on the remittance of the withheld or surrendered amounts, including the requirement that each check or remittance:

Be payable to the family support registry and sent to the address indicated in the notice;

Be surrendered within thirty days after the date of notice of lien and levy; and

Include the family support registry action number on the face of the check or remittance;

A statement that, if no funds are available for surrender, the financial institution shall return the remittance notice within thirty days after the date of the notice of lien and levy; and

A statement that the administrative lien and levy is automatically inactivated once the financial institution has returned the remittance notice or surrendered the funds held by the financial institution.

In order to attach and collect funds in a financial account identified pursuant to section 26-13-128 for past-due child support, the state child support enforcement agency is authorized to serve, by first-class mail or by electronic means if mutually agreed upon, a notice of administrative lien and levy on any financial institution or its agent that holds the obligor parent's account or accounts. A copy of the administrative lien and levy must be provided to the obligor and must include information on the obligor's and, if applicable, a joint account holder or holders', right to file an applicable exception, exemption, or appeal, including but not limited to, custodial accounts pursuant to section 11-50-110, the earnings limitations set forth in section 13-54-104 (3), and the appeal policy for jointly owned or shared accounts.

Subsection (3) of this section applies to all past-due child support obligations ordered as part of any proceeding, regardless of when the order was entered, and all such child support obligors are subject to notice of administrative lien and levy as described in subsection (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1215), ch. 270, p. 2554, § 6, effective July 1.

26-13-122.5. Administrative lien and attachment of inmate bank accounts.

The state child support enforcement agency or the delegate child support enforcement unit may issue a notice of administrative lien and attachment, only when such notice is prescribed and approved by the state child support enforcement agency, to the department of corrections or its agent having custody or control of inmate bank accounts in order to withhold funds from the bank account of a state inmate, as defined in section 17-1-102 (8), C.R.S., who is an obligor responsible for the support of a child or children on whose behalf the obligee is receiving support enforcement services from the state child support enforcement agency or a delegate child support enforcement unit pursuant to this article or who is an obligor responsible for the payment of maintenance or maintenance when combined with child support and the obligee is receiving support enforcement services from the state child support enforcement agency or a delegate child support enforcement unit pursuant to this article.

A copy of the administrative lien and attachment shall be provided to the obligor by the department of corrections or its agent and shall include information on the obligor's right to object to the administrative lien and attachment and to request an administrative review pursuant to the rules of the state board.

The notice of administrative lien and attachment shall contain:

The name and address of the correctional facility or entity that withholds funds from inmate bank accounts;

The name and social security number of the inmate and the name of the correctional facility in which the inmate is incarcerated;

The total amount owed for current monthly child support, current maintenance when combined with child support, current maintenance, past due child support, past due maintenance when combined with child support, past due maintenance, child support debt, retroactive child support, or medical support;

The amount or percentage of funds to be withheld monthly from inmate bank accounts, which amount or percentage shall not be less than fifty percent of the total amount withheld pursuant to section 16-18.5-106 (2), C.R.S.;

A statement that the notice of administrative lien and attachment is to take effect no later than forty-five days after receipt of the notice by the department of corrections;

A statement that if more than one notice of administrative lien and attachment is received for the same obligor, the priorities set forth in subsection (4) of this section shall apply;

Instruction on the disbursement of the withheld amounts, including the requirements that each disbursement:

Shall be forwarded to the family support registry;

Shall be forwarded within ten calendar days after the date of each deduction and withholding;

Shall be identified by the case number, the family support registry account number, and the name and social security number of the obligor and shall identify the date the deduction was made and the amount of the payment;

A statement that compliance with the notice of administrative lien and attachment shall not subject the department of corrections or its agent to liability to the obligor for wrongful withholding of funds;

A statement that, as long as the obligor is incarcerated and has an obligation pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (3), the notice of administrative lien and attachment shall not be terminated or modified, except upon written notice by the state child support enforcement agency or the delegate child support enforcement unit, unless the inmate is indigent according to department of corrections guidelines.

An administrative lien and attachment for the collection from inmate bank accounts of current monthly child support, current maintenance when combined with child support, current maintenance, past due child support, past due maintenance when combined with child support, past due maintenance, child support debt, retroactive child support, or medical support shall be continuing and shall have priority over any garnishment, lien, or wage assignment other than a notice previously served pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or a wage assignment activated pursuant to section 14-14-107 or 14-14-111, C.R.S., as those sections existed prior to July 1, 1996, or section 14-14-111.5, C.R.S. In order to attach inmate bank accounts for current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, medical support, child support arrearages, or child support when combined with maintenance, the state child support enforcement agency or the delegate child support enforcement unit is authorized to serve, by first-class mail or by electronic service, a notice of administrative lien and attachment on the department of corrections or its agent to withhold funds of an obligor.

Subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section shall apply to all child support obligations, maintenance when combined with child support, maintenance obligations, retroactive child support obligations, and medical support obligations ordered as a part of any proceeding, regardless of when the order was entered, and all such obligors shall be subject to notice of administrative lien and attachment as described in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1711, § 9, effective September 1.

L. 2004:

(3)(d) and (4) amended, p. 388, § 8, effective July 1.